Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.130

Additional requirements.

(1) When sentencing or imposing conditions on a person convicted of, or receiving a deferred sentence or deferred prosecution for, violating RCW 9A.88.110 or 9.68A.100, the court must impose a requirement that the offender:

(a) Not be subsequently arrested for patronizing a prostitute or commercial sexual abuse of a minor;

(b) Remain outside the geographical area, prescribed by the court, in which the person was arrested for violating RCW 9A.88.110 or 9.68A.100, unless such a requirement would interfere with the person's legitimate employment or residence or otherwise be infeasible; and

(c) Fulfill the terms of a program, if a first-time offender, designated by the sentencing court, designed to educate offenders about the negative costs of prostitution.

(2) This requirement is in addition to the penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110, 9A.88.120, and 9.68A.100.

[ 2012 c 136 s 2; 1999 c 327 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1999 c 327: "The legislature finds that most law enforcement effort to prevent prostitution is directed at punishing prostitutes. The legislature also finds that many patrons of prostitutes use motor vehicles in order to obtain the services of prostitutes and that successful prevention of prostitution involves efforts to curtail the demand for services offered by prostitutes. It is the intent of the legislature to decrease the demand for prostitution services and thereby eliminate the economic foundation for the prostitution industry. It is also the intent of the legislature to eliminate traffic congestion and other concerns to neighborhoods and business areas caused by patrons cruising in motor vehicles in areas of high prostitution activity." [ 1999 c 327 s 1.]